Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Receipt and Disbursement

Cross references. —

For general provisions relative to auditor and treasurer, see §

9-1-401

et seq.

For constitutional provision that money shall be expended only on appropriation, see art. 3, § 35, Wyo. Const.

As to disposition of unexpended income of perpetual school fund, see art. 18, § 6, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Funds § 1 et seq.

81A C.J.S. States §§ 223 to 229.

§ 9-4-101.
Fiscal year; delivery of state property by treasurer and auditor to successors.

The fiscal year for all agencies, boards, commissions, departments, instrumentalities or institutions of the state government shall commence on July 1 in each year, except as otherwise specifically provided or authorized by law. At the end of their respective terms of office the treasurer and auditor shall deliver to their successors all official books, papers, records and balances of funds in their possession. If either or both successors are not elected or appointed and qualified, the existing incumbent of the office shall retain the state property until the election or appointment and qualification of his successor occurs.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 47, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1731; R.S. 1899, § 177; C.S. 1910, § 259; C.S. 1920, § 299; R.S. 1931, § 109-1409; Laws 1945, ch. 65, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 20-111; W.S. 1957, § 9-541; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-401; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2009, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “agencies, boards, commissions,” preceding “departments”, and “instrumentalities or institutions” preceding “of the state”
and added “except as otherwise specifically provided or authorized by law” in the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4 provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law.
The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts.
Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

Cross references. —

As to fiscal year of game and fish commission and department, see §

23-1-502

.

Treasurer's sureties not liable for funds lost in insolvent private bank. —

The sureties on a treasurer's bond are not liable for the loss of funds deposited in a private bank, which, owing to panic, becomes insolvent, the greater portion of the funds becoming lost. State v. Gramm, 7 Wyo. 329, 52 P. 533,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1898).

§ 9-4-102.
Creation of expense in excess of appropriation; liability of officer therefor; penalty for violation.

Except as otherwise provided by law, no state officer is authorized to create any expense of any kind or character as a charge against the state in excess of the amount appropriated for his use. Any officer creating an expense in excess of the appropriation is responsible for the expenditure under his official bond.

Any person or board, who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) and may be removed from office.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 35, §§ 3, 5; R.S. 1899, §§ 171, 172; C.S. 1910, §§ 249, 250; C.S. 1920, §§ 289, 290; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-402, 109-403; C.S. 1945, §§ 20-101, 20-103; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-542, 9-543; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-7-402, 9-7-403; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-4-103.
Account of expenditures; public inspection; vouchers for allowances.

When an appropriation is made by law for any purpose, to be expended for the state, the officer or board having charge of the appropriation shall keep an account therewith, showing when, to whom and for what purpose any portion of the appropriation has been expended. The account shall always be open for public inspection. Every officer or person presenting any voucher to any board for allowance, or to the auditor for payment, shall have affixed to the voucher a full itemized statement in writing covering the claim and the claim shall be approved for allowance by the proper board, department head or officer. Any claims failing to comply with this provision shall be rejected by the auditor or any of the boards to which the claims are presented.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 35, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 173; C.S. 1910, § 251; C.S. 1920, § 291; R.S. 1931, § 109-1404; C.S. 1945, § 20-102; W.S. 1957, § 9-544; Laws 1971, ch. 33, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-404; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; ch. 75, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to embezzlement of funds by public officers, see §

9-4-104

.

For constitutional provision as to payments of public money from state treasury, see art. 16, § 7, Wyo. Const.

As to larceny and related offenses, see §§

6-3-401

through

6-3-411

.

§ 9-4-104.
Withholding salary in case of embezzlement of public funds or failure to pay over fees.

If any officer of the state, or of any county or municipal corporation therein, having the custody of public funds, embezzles the funds, or if any public officer whose duty it is to pay into the treasury of the state, county or municipal corporation, any fees collected by him, fails at the times required by law to pay over the fees into the proper public treasury, the officer whose duty it is to audit and allow claims for salary of any officer or to issue a warrant in payment of the salary, may withhold the salary due to the officer, until the embezzlement, if any, is satisfied, or until the fees unlawfully retained by the officer are properly turned over and paid into the proper public treasury. If the director of the state department of audit determines that any embezzlement exists, or that any fees have been improperly retained by any public officer, the auditing officer or board shall withhold the person’s salary until embezzlement is satisfied, or the fees are turned into the proper public treasury, or a court of competent jurisdiction arrives at a different conclusion from that of the director and decrees that no embezzlement or failure to pay over fees existed.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 119, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1236; C.S. 1910, § 1148; C.S. 1920, § 1384; R.S. 1931, § 30-127; C.S. 1945, § 20-104; W.S. 1957, § 9-545; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-405; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the state banking commissioner, see §

13-1-601

.

Cited

in

Morgan v. City of Rawlins, 792 F.2d 975, 1986 U.S. App. LEXIS 25532 (10th Cir. 1986).

§ 9-4-105.
Cancellation of unpaid state warrants.

The state auditor shall cancel all state warrants that have been issued for one (1) year and which have not been presented to the state treasurer for payment. The money shall revert to the fund and account upon which the warrant was originally drawn or to the general fund if the original account no longer exists.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 93, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1864; C.S. 1910, § 2398; C.S. 1920, § 2847; R.S. 1931, § 115-312; C.S. 1945, § 20-105; W.S. 1957, § 9-546; Laws 1973, ch. 41, § 1; 1975, ch. 42, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-406; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-4-106.
Interest on public warrants.

All state, county, school district, town, city or other public warrants issued for any salary, fee or for any public indebtedness, claim or demand which has accrued on any public contract, transaction or liability shall draw interest upon the amount expressed in the warrant from the date of presentation for payment at the treasury or other place at which the warrant may be payable until there are sufficient funds in the treasury for payment. The rate of interest shall be established by the governmental entity based upon market conditions at the time of presentation of the warrant for payment and shall be stated within the warrant. No rate of interest shall be allowed or paid upon a warrant except as established under this section.

Each state or county treasurer or municipal officer authorized to act as treasurer, to whom a warrant is presented for payment and funds in the treasury are insufficient to pay the warrant, shall endorse the words “not paid, for want of funds” and officially sign and date the warrant.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 22, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2457; C.S. 1910, § 3365; C.S. 1920, § 4140; R.S. 1931, § 58-111; Laws 1941, ch. 88, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 20-110; W.S. 1957, § 9-551; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-407; Laws 1981, ch. 77, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1988, ch. 23, § 1; 1989, ch. 12, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to legal rate of interest in absence of agreement or provision of law, see § 40-14-106(e).

Applied

in

First Nat'l Bank v. School Dist., 6 Wyo. 485, 46 P. 1090,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1896).

§ 9-4-107.
Balancing of accounts.

All fiscal officers of the state shall balance their respective accounts at 12:00 noon on December 31, and at 12:00 noon on June 30 in each year.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 54, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 178; C.S. 1910, § 260; C.S. 1920, § 300; R.S. 1931, § 109-1410; C.S. 1945, § 20-112; Laws 1955, ch. 9, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-552; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-408; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-4-108.
Crediting of investment returns.

Earnings on state funds invested by the state treasurer shall be credited to accounts or funds as provided by law and as follows:

Interest, dividends and rents earned shall be credited not later than at the end of the second month following each fiscal quarter;

Subject to paragraph (iii) of this subsection, other realized earnings shall be credited as soon as practicable after the end of the fiscal year but no later than ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal year in which the earnings were realized;

Any debit against the account or fund which exists as a result of realized investment losses from a prior years' investments of the fund or account shall be paid before distributions under paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

Subject to the requirements of paragraph (iii) of this subsection, the state treasurer may credit any earnings at such earlier times than provided in this section and in such amounts as may be advantageous for the state's investment program and cash management.

Any provision of law which specifies the crediting or distribution of a state fund investment earnings to a specific fund or account at a time different than the provisions of this section shall control over this section.

History.

2021 ch. 144, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 144, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.